Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4698.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 24e. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section and notwithstanding any charter provision to the contrary, all terms of village officers elected after December 31, 2024 must not commence earlier than at 12 noon on December 1 following the officer's election. If a village's charter provides for terms of village officers to commence after an election and before December 1, all terms of village officers elected in that village after December 31, 2024 commence at 12 noon on December 1. (2) Notwithstanding any charter provision to the contrary, an individual elected to fill a vacancy shall not take the oath of office until the results have been certified by the appropriate board of canvassers.